src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-CVCV_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

!! short vowel
!! stems ending in a short vowel except i

  Noun - һара: # 
    һара+N+Pl+Nom: һара
    һара+N+Pl+Gen: һарын
    һара+N+Pl+Acc: һарые
    һара+N+Pl+Dat: һарада
    һара+N+Pl+Abl: һараһаа
    һара+N+Pl+Ins: һараар
    һара+N+Pl+Com: һаратай

  Noun - шоро: # 
    шоро+N+Pl+Nom: шоро
    шоро+N+Pl+Gen: шорын
    шоро+N+Pl+Acc: шорые
    шоро+N+Pl+Dat: шородо
    шоро+N+Pl+Abl: шороһоо
    шоро+N+Pl+Ins: шороор
    шоро+N+Pl+Com: шоротой

  Noun - тэргэ: # 
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Nom: тэргэ
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Gen: тэргын
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Acc: тэргые
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Dat: тэргэдэ
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Abl: тэргэһээ
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Ins: тэргээр
    тэргэ+N+Pl+Com: тэргэтэй

  Noun - хүүргэ: # 
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Nom: хүүргэ
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Gen: хүүргын
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Acc: хүүргые
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Dat: хүүргэдэ
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Abl: [хүүргэһээ, хүүргэһөө]
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Ins: [хүүргээр, хүүргөөр]
    хүүргэ+N+Pl+Com: хүүргэтэй

  Noun - бөөрэ: # 
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Nom: бөөрэ
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Gen: бөөрын
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Acc: бөөрые
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Dat: бөөрэдэ
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Abl: [бөөрэһөө, бөөрэһээ]
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Ins: бөөрөөр
    бөөрэ+N+Pl+Com: бөөрэтэй

  Noun - түрэ: # 
    түрэ+N+Pl+Nom: түрэ
    түрэ+N+Pl+Gen: түрын
    түрэ+N+Pl+Acc: түрые
    түрэ+N+Pl+Dat: түрэдэ
    түрэ+N+Pl+Abl: [түрэһөө, түрэһээ]
    түрэ+N+Pl+Ins: [түрөөр, түрээр]
    түрэ+N+Pl+Com: түрэтэй

!! short vowel
!! Stems ending in n with a preceding short vowel except i
!! Only Gen differs from the above category
!! n is deleted in Acc, Ins, and in the alternative form of Com

  Noun - наран: # 
    наран+N+Pl+Nom: наран
    наран+N+Pl+Gen: наранай
    наран+N+Pl+Acc: нарые
    наран+N+Pl+Dat: наранда
    наран+N+Pl+Abl: наранһаа
    наран+N+Pl+Ins: [нараар, наранаар]
    наран+N+Pl+Com: [наратай, нарантай]

  Noun - хорон: # 
    хорон+N+Pl+Nom: хорон
    хорон+N+Pl+Gen: хороной
    хорон+N+Pl+Acc: хорые
    хорон+N+Pl+Dat: хорондо
    хорон+N+Pl+Abl: хоронһоо
    хорон+N+Pl+Ins: хороор
    хорон+N+Pl+Com: [хоротой, хоронтой]

  Noun - хэлэн: # 
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Nom: хэлэн
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Gen: хэлэнэй
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Acc: хэлые
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Dat: хэлэндэ
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Abl: хэлэнһээ
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Ins: хэлээр
    хэлэн+N+Pl+Com: [хэлэтэй, хэлэнтэй]

  Noun - үүлэн: # 
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Nom: үүлэн
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Gen: үүлэнэй
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Acc: үүлые
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Dat: үүлэндэ
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Abl: [үүлэнһээ, үүлэнһөө]
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Ins: [үүлээр, үүлөөр]
    үүлэн+N+Pl+Com: [үүлэтэй, үүлэнтэй]

  Noun - бөөһэн: # 
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Nom: бөөһэн
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Gen: бөөһэнэй
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Acc: бөөһые
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Dat: бөөһэндэ
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Abl: [бөөһэнһөө, бөөһэнһээ]
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Ins: бөөһөөр
    бөөһэн+N+Pl+Com: [бөөһэтэй, бөөһэнтэй]

  Noun - шүлэн: # 
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Nom: шүлэн
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Gen: шүлэнэй
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Acc: шүлые
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Dat: шүлэндэ
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Abl: [шүлэнһөө, шүлэнһээ]
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Ins: [шүлөөр, шүлээр]
    шүлэн+N+Pl+Com: [шүлэтэй, шүлэнтэй]

!! short vowel
!! Stems ending in short i

  Noun - шаби: # 
    шаби+N+Pl+Nom: шаби
    шаби+N+Pl+Gen: шабиин
    шаби+N+Pl+Acc: шабиие
    шаби+N+Pl+Dat: шабида
    шаби+N+Pl+Abl: шабиһаа
    шаби+N+Pl+Ins: шабяар
    шаби+N+Pl+Com: шабитай

  Noun - боори: # 
    боори+N+Pl+Nom: боори
    боори+N+Pl+Gen: боориин
    боори+N+Pl+Acc: боориие
    боори+N+Pl+Dat: бооридо
    боори+N+Pl+Abl: боориһоо
    боори+N+Pl+Ins: боорёор
    боори+N+Pl+Com: бооритой

  Noun - мөөри: # 
    мөөри+N+Pl+Nom: мөөри
    мөөри+N+Pl+Gen: мөөриин
    мөөри+N+Pl+Acc: мөөриие
    мөөри+N+Pl+Dat: мөөридэ
    мөөри+N+Pl+Abl: мөөриһөө
    мөөри+N+Pl+Ins: мөөреэр
    мөөри+N+Pl+Com: мөөритэй

  Noun - үри: # 
    үри+N+Pl+Nom: үри
    үри+N+Pl+Gen: үриин
    үри+N+Pl+Acc: үриие
    үри+N+Pl+Dat: үридэ
    үри+N+Pl+Abl: [үриһөө, үриһээ]
    үри+N+Pl+Ins: үреэр
    үри+N+Pl+Com: үритэй

  Noun - бэри: # 
    бэри+N+Pl+Nom: бэри
    бэри+N+Pl+Gen: бэриин
    бэри+N+Pl+Acc: бэриие
    бэри+N+Pl+Dat: бэридэ
    бэри+N+Pl+Abl: бэриһээ
    бэри+N+Pl+Ins: бэреэр
    бэри+N+Pl+Com: бэритэй

!! short vowel
!! Stems ending in n with a preceding short i vowel 
!! Only Gen differs from the above category
!! n is deleted in Acc, Ins, and in the alternative form of Com

  Noun - амин: # 
    амин+N+Pl+Nom: амин
    амин+N+Pl+Gen: аминай
    амин+N+Pl+Acc: амиие
    амин+N+Pl+Dat: аминда
    амин+N+Pl+Abl: аминһаа
    амин+N+Pl+Ins: амяар
    амин+N+Pl+Com: [амитай, аминтай]

  Noun - морин: # 
    морин+N+Pl+Nom: морин
    морин+N+Pl+Gen: мориной
    морин+N+Pl+Acc: мориие
    морин+N+Pl+Dat: мориндо
    морин+N+Pl+Abl: моринһоо
    морин+N+Pl+Ins: морёор
    морин+N+Pl+Com: [моритой, моринтой]

  Noun - бүлхин: # 
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Nom: бүлхин
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Gen: бүлхинэй
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Acc: бүлхиие
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Dat: бүлхиндэ
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Abl: [бүлхинһөө, бүлхинһээ]
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Ins: бүлхеэр
    бүлхин+N+Pl+Com: [бүлхитэй, бүлхинтэй]

  Noun - эхин: # 
    эхин+N+Pl+Nom: эхин
    эхин+N+Pl+Gen: эхинэй
    эхин+N+Pl+Acc: эхиие
    эхин+N+Pl+Dat: эхиндэ
    эхин+N+Pl+Abl: эхинһээ
    эхин+N+Pl+Ins: эхеэр
    эхин+N+Pl+Com: [эхитэй, эхинтэй]

!! long vowel
!! Stems ending in a diphthong
!! Differs from the next only by Gen

  Noun - малгай: # 
    малгай+N+Pl+Nom: малгай
    малгай+N+Pl+Gen: малгайн
    малгай+N+Pl+Acc: малгайе
    малгай+N+Pl+Dat: малгайда
    малгай+N+Pl+Abl: малгайһаа
    малгай+N+Pl+Ins: малгайгаар
    малгай+N+Pl+Com: малгайтай

  Noun - толгой: # 
    толгой+N+Pl+Nom: толгой
    толгой+N+Pl+Gen: толгойн
    толгой+N+Pl+Acc: толгойе
    толгой+N+Pl+Dat: толгойдо
    толгой+N+Pl+Abl: толгойһоо
    толгой+N+Pl+Ins: толгойгоор
    толгой+N+Pl+Com: толгойтой

  Noun - бээлэй: # 
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Nom: бээлэй
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Gen: бээлэйн
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Acc: бээлэйе
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Dat: бээлэйдэ
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Abl: бээлэйһээ
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Ins: бээлэйгээр
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Com: бээлэйтэй

  Noun - төөлэй: # 
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Nom: төөлэй
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Gen: төөлэйн
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Acc: төөлэйе
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Dat: төөлэйдэ
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Abl: төөлэйһөө
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Ins: төөлэйгөөр
    төөлэй+N+Pl+Com: төөлэйтэй

!! long vowel
!! Stems ending in a long vowel

  Noun - баглаа: # 
    баглаа+N+Pl+Nom: баглаа
    баглаа+N+Pl+Gen: баглаагай
    баглаа+N+Pl+Acc: баглаае
    баглаа+N+Pl+Dat: баглаада
    баглаа+N+Pl+Abl: баглааһаа
    баглаа+N+Pl+Ins: баглаагаар
    баглаа+N+Pl+Com: баглаатай

  Noun - хобоо: # 
    хобоо+N+Pl+Nom: хобоо
    хобоо+N+Pl+Gen: хобоогой
    хобоо+N+Pl+Acc: хобоое
    хобоо+N+Pl+Dat: хобоодо
    хобоо+N+Pl+Abl: хобооһоо
    хобоо+N+Pl+Ins: хобоогоор
    хобоо+N+Pl+Com: хобоотой

  Noun - һэрбээ: # 
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Nom: һэрбээ
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Gen: һэрбээгэй
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Acc: һэрбээе
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Dat: һэрбээдэ
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Abl: һэрбээһээ
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Ins: һэрбээгээр
    һэрбээ+N+Pl+Com: һэрбээтэй

  Noun - хюрөө: # 
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Nom: хюрөө
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Gen: хюрөөгэй
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Acc: хюрөөе
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Dat: хюрөөдэ
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Abl: хюрөөһөө
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Ins: хюрөөгөөр
    хюрөө+N+Pl+Com: хюрөөтэй

!! long vowel
!! Stems ending in n with a preceding long vowel

  Noun - һанаан: # 
    һанаан+N+Pl+Nom: һанаан
    һанаан+N+Pl+Gen: һанаанай
    һанаан+N+Pl+Acc: һанаае
    һанаан+N+Pl+Dat: һанаанда
    һанаан+N+Pl+Abl: һанаанһаа
    һанаан+N+Pl+Ins: һанаагаар
    һанаан+N+Pl+Com: һанаатай

  Noun - тогоон: # 
    тогоон+N+Pl+Nom: тогоон
    тогоон+N+Pl+Gen: тогооной
    тогоон+N+Pl+Acc: тогоое
    тогоон+N+Pl+Dat: тогоондо
    тогоон+N+Pl+Abl: тогоонһоо
    тогоон+N+Pl+Ins: тогоогоор
    тогоон+N+Pl+Com: [тогоотой, тогоонтой]

  Noun - тэмээн: # 
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Nom: тэмээн
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Gen: тэмээнэй
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Acc: тэмээе
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Dat: тэмээндэ
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Abl: тэмээнһээ
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Ins: тэмээгээр
    тэмээн+N+Pl+Com: [тэмээтэй, тэмээнтэй]

  Noun - зүблөөн: # 
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Nom: жүтөөн
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Gen: жүтөөнэй
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Acc: жүтөөе
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Dat: жүтөөндэ
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Abl: жүтөөнһөө
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Ins: жүтөөгөөр
    жүтөөн+N+Pl+Com: жүтөөтэй
